Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5700.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3. (1) "Elevator" means the machinery, construction, apparatus, and equipment of an incline lift, escalator, moving walk, or device serving 2 or more landings used in raising and lowering a car, cage, or platform which that is guided. The term Elevator includes a passenger elevator, freight elevator, gravity elevator, workmen's elevator, dumbwaiter, manlift, or other lifting or lowering apparatus that is guided. The term Elevator does not include any of the following: (a) An elevating device within the scope of 1911 PA 163, MCL 425.101 to 425.113. (b) A feeding machine or belted bucket, scoop, roller, or any similar type of freight conveyor. (c) A lubrication hoist or other similar mechanism. (d) A piling or stacking machine that is used within 1 story and does not penetrate a floor. (e) A residential stairway chairlift or residential platform lift. (f) An outside material hoist used for raising or lowering construction materials while a building or structure is under construction within the scope of the Michigan occupational safety and health act, 1974 PA 154, MCL 408.1001 to 408.1094. (g) A private residence vertical lift. (2) "Elevator contractor" means a person that is engaged in the business of constructing, installing, maintaining, repairing, or altering elevators, including the installing or maintaining of electric wiring, fixtures, apparatus, and appliances in connection with the operation or control of elevators. (3) "Elevator contractor license" means a license issued by the director to an elevator contractor that authorizes the licensee to engage in the construction, installation, alteration, maintenance, or repair of elevators. Sec. 4. (1) "General inspector" means an individual who holds a general certificate of competency and is employed by this state as an elevator inspector or in an elevator inspection supervisory capacity. (2) "Incline lift" means an elevator that is designed and operated to transport individuals or material from 1 level to another. The term Incline lift does not include the enclosure or building, an incline lift under the jurisdiction of the ski area safety board, or a residential stairway chairlift or residential platform lift. (3) "Inspector" means a general inspector or special inspector. (4) "Nationally recognized testing laboratory" means an organization recognized by the United States Occupational Health and Safety Administration under 29 CFR 1910.7. (5) (4) "Person" means an individual, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association, governmental entity, or any other legal entity. (6) "Private residence vertical lift" means a vertical lift in a private residence that is intended for the transportation of 1 individual at a time and meets the requirements of section 14b. Private residence vertical lift does not include any of the following: (a) An elevator. (b) A residential stairway chairlift or residential platform lift. (c) A dumbwaiter. (d) A material lift. (e) Portable equipment. (f) An amusement or stage lift. (7) (5) "Residential stairway chairlift or residential platform lift" means an inclined stairway chairlift or inclined and vertical platform lift in or at a private residence that is intended only for transportation of an individual whose mobility is impaired, meets the requirements of section 14a, and is manufactured in compliance with the American society of mechanical engineers standard 18.1-2008 or any revision to that standard approved by the department. The term Residential stairway chairlift or residential platform lift does not include an elevator, escalator, moving walkway, material lift, dumbwaiter, personnel hoist, powered platform and equipment for exterior and interior building maintenance, private residence vertical lift, amusement device, or stage or orchestra lift or any portable equipment used to lift or transport individuals or material. (8) (6) "Special inspector" means an individual who holds a special certificate of competency and is commissioned under this act. (9) (7) "Standard", unless the context requires otherwise, means the American standard safety code for elevators, dumbwaiters, escalators, and moving walks, A 17.1-1965. (10) (8) "State construction code" means the code , as that term is defined in section 2a of the Stille-DeRossett-Hale single state construction code act, 1972 PA 230, MCL 125.1502a. (11) "Traditional hoistway" means a permanent, fire-rated vertical shaft or space constructed as part of a building or structure to enclose an elevator car. Sec. 14b. (1) An individual shall not install, construct, repair, alter, or maintain a private residence vertical lift unless the private residence vertical lift is certified as safe by a nationally recognized testing laboratory in compliance with any of the following standards: (a) The American Society of Mechanical Engineers standard A17.1-2022. (b) The American Society of Mechanical Engineers standard A17.7-2007. (c) The most recent edition of the standards described in subparagraph (a) or (b), as approved by the department. (2) A private residence vertical lift may, but is not required to, have a full passenger enclosure or traditional hoistway. (3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act or the rules promulgated under this act, the department shall not require a private residence vertical lift to include a pit, machine room, or traditional hoistway if the private residence vertical lift meets both of the following requirements: (a) Is installed according to the manufacturer's specifications. (b) Is certified by a nationally recognized testing laboratory to meet the performance-based safety requirements of the American Society of Mechanical Engineers standard A17.7-2007.